Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2899.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2899.1. A. All elected county officials, peace
officers and law enforcement organizations in the State of Oklahoma
shall be permitted to request to a county assessor that personal
information regarding elected county officials, peace officers or
undercover or covert law enforcement officers not be made publicly
available on the Internet, but instead kept in a secure location at
the office of the county assessor where it may be made available to
authorized persons pursuant to law. The program manager of the
Oklahoma Attorney General's Address Confidentiality Program,
administered under Section 60.14 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, shall be permitted to request to a county assessor that
personal information regarding a certified Address Confidentiality

Program participant, upon the participant's proof of certification,
not be made publicly available on the Internet, but instead kept in
a secure location at the office of the county assessor where it may
be made available to authorized persons pursuant to law.
B. Any elected county official, peace officer or, law
enforcement official on behalf of an undercover or covert officer,
or Address Confidentiality Program participant who wishes to have
the personal information of the elected county official, peace
officer or, undercover or covert officer, or Address Confidentiality
Program participant that is contained in the records of a county
assessor be kept confidential must obtain an order of a court that
requires the county assessor to maintain the personal information of
the person or entity in a confidential manner. Such an order must
be based on a sworn affidavit by the elected county official, peace
officer or, law enforcement official, or current Address
Confidentiality Program participant which affidavit:
1. States that the individual whose information is to be kept
confidential is:
a. an elected county official,
b. a peace officer, or
c. an undercover or covert officer; and, or
d. a current Address Confidentiality Program participant;
and
2. Sets forth sufficient justification for the request for
confidentiality.
C. Upon receipt of such an order, a county assessor shall keep
such information confidential and shall not disclose the
confidential information to anyone not specifically authorized by
law to view the information, unless disclosure is specifically
authorized in writing by that person or the affiant. A county
assessor shall not post such confidential information on the
Internet.
D. As used in this section:
1. "Elected county official" means a person elected to a county
office;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1360 Page 2

2. "Peace officer" shall have the same meaning as that term is
defined in Section 99 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
3. "Program participant" shall have the same meaning as that
term is defined in Section 60.14 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma
Statutes; and
4. "Personal information" means:
a. the home address of a person,
b. the home address of the spouse, domestic partner or
minor child of a person, and
c. any telephone number or electronic mail address of a
person.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1360 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1360 Page 4